test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-aqilw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - aʼilõ: # Verb 51 'eng /est joosta/fin' - full paradigm
     aʼilõ+V+Inf: [aʼilõ, ailõ]
     aʼilõ+V+Ger: [aʼilõs, ailõs]
     aʼilõ+V+Sup: [aʼilõm, ailõm]
     aʼilõ+V+Sup+Ine: [aʼilõmõs, ailõmõs]
     aʼilõ+V+Sup+Ela: [aʼilõmõst, ailõmõst]
     aʼilõ+V+Sup+Tra: [aʼilõmõks, ailõmõks]
     aʼilõ+V+Sup+Abe: [aʼilõmõt, ailõmõt]
     aʼilõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [aʼilõb, ailõb]
     aʼilõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [aʼilõt, ailõt]
     aʼilõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [aʼilõbõd, ailõbõd]
     aʼilõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [aʼiliz, ailiz]
     aʼilõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [[aʼilizt, aʼiliztõ], [ailizt, aʼiliztõ]]
     aʼilõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [[aʼilizt, aʼiliztõ], [ailizt, aʼiliztõ]]
     aʼilõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [aʼil, ail]
     aʼilõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [aʼilõks, ailõks]
     aʼilõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [aʼil, ail]
     aʼilõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [aʼil, ail]
     aʼilõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [aʼilõgid, ailõgid]
     aʼilõ+V+Jus+Sg3: [aʼilõg, ailõg]
     aʼilõ+V+Quo+Sg3: [aʼiliji, ailiji]
     aʼilõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [aʼilõn, ailõn]
     aʼilõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [aʼildõd, aildõd]
